src/fst/morphology/stems/ojibwe_pronouns.lexc
LEXICON PRONInter+NA+ObvSg_PrefixBoundary
0:%<%< PronounStems ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: PRONInter+NA+ObvSg                                         !
!         Stems                                                                !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PRONInter+NA+ObvSg_Stems
awenenan PRONInter+NA+ObvSg_Class=PRONInter+NA+ObvSg_Boundary ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: PRONInter+NA+ObvSg, Class: PRONInter+NA+ObvSg              !
!         Morpheme boundary between stem and suffix                            !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PRONInter+NA+ObvSg_Class=PRONInter+NA+ObvSg_Boundary
0:%>%> PRONInter+NA+ObvSg_Class=PRONInter+NA+ObvSg_Flags ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: PRONInter+NA+ObvSg, Class: PRONInter+NA+ObvSg              !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending                                                    !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PRONInter+NA+ObvSg_Class=PRONInter+NA+ObvSg_Flags
@R.Prefix.NONE@ PRONInter+NA+ObvSg_Class=PRONInter+NA+ObvSg_Flags_Prefix=NONE ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: PRONInter+NA+ObvSg, Class: PRONInter+NA+ObvSg              !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending_Prefix=NONE                                        !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PRONInter+NA+ObvSg_Class=PRONInter+NA+ObvSg_Flags_Prefix=NONE
@U.Order.Other@ PRONInter+NA+ObvSg_Class=PRONInter+NA+ObvSg_Prefix=NONE_Order=Other_Endings ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: PRONInter+NA+ObvSg, Class: PRONInter+NA+ObvSg, Prefix: NONE, Order: Other
!         Endings                                                              !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PRONInter+NA+ObvSg_Class=PRONInter+NA+ObvSg_Prefix=NONE_Order=Other_Endings
+PRONInter+NA+ObvSg: EncliticRoot ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: PRONInter+NA+ObvPl                                         !
!         Prefixes                                                             !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PRONInter+NA+ObvPl_Prefix
@P.Prefix.NONE@ PRONInter+NA+ObvPl_PrefixBoundary ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: PRONInter+NA+ObvPl                                         !
!         Morpheme boundary between prefix and stem                            !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PRONInter+NA+ObvPl_PrefixBoundary
0:%<%< PronounStems ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: PRONInter+NA+ObvPl                                         !
!         Stems                                                                !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PRONInter+NA+ObvPl_Stems
awenena' PRONInter+NA+ObvPl_Class=PRONInter+NA+ObvPl_Boundary ;
awenenan PRONInter+NA+ObvPl_Class=PRONInter+NA+ObvPl_Boundary ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: PRONInter+NA+ObvPl, Class: PRONInter+NA+ObvPl              !
!         Morpheme boundary between stem and suffix                            !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PRONInter+NA+ObvPl_Class=PRONInter+NA+ObvPl_Boundary
0:%>%> PRONInter+NA+ObvPl_Class=PRONInter+NA+ObvPl_Flags ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: PRONInter+NA+ObvPl, Class: PRONInter+NA+ObvPl              !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending                                                    !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PRONInter+NA+ObvPl_Class=PRONInter+NA+ObvPl_Flags
@R.Prefix.NONE@ PRONInter+NA+ObvPl_Class=PRONInter+NA+ObvPl_Flags_Prefix=NONE ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: PRONInter+NA+ObvPl, Class: PRONInter+NA+ObvPl              !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending_Prefix=NONE                                        !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PRONInter+NA+ObvPl_Class=PRONInter+NA+ObvPl_Flags_Prefix=NONE
@U.Order.Other@ PRONInter+NA+ObvPl_Class=PRONInter+NA+ObvPl_Prefix=NONE_Order=Other_Endings ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: PRONInter+NA+ObvPl, Class: PRONInter+NA+ObvPl, Prefix: NONE, Order: Other
!         Endings                                                              !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PRONInter+NA+ObvPl_Class=PRONInter+NA+ObvPl_Prefix=NONE_Order=Other_Endings
+PRONInter+NA+ObvPl: EncliticRoot ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: PRONInter+NA+ProxPl                                        !
!         Prefixes                                                             !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PRONInter+NA+ProxPl_Prefix
@P.Prefix.NONE@ PRONInter+NA+ProxPl_PrefixBoundary ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: PRONInter+NA+ProxPl                                        !
!         Morpheme boundary between prefix and stem                            !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PRONInter+NA+ProxPl_PrefixBoundary
0:%<%< PronounStems ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: PRONInter+NA+ProxPl                                        !
!         Stems                                                                !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PRONInter+NA+ProxPl_Stems
awenenag PRONInter+NA+ProxPl_Class=PRONInter+NA+ProxPl_Boundary ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: PRONInter+NA+ProxPl, Class: PRONInter+NA+ProxPl            !
!         Morpheme boundary between stem and suffix                            !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PRONInter+NA+ProxPl_Class=PRONInter+NA+ProxPl_Boundary
0:%>%> PRONInter+NA+ProxPl_Class=PRONInter+NA+ProxPl_Flags ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: PRONInter+NA+ProxPl, Class: PRONInter+NA+ProxPl            !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending                                                    !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PRONInter+NA+ProxPl_Class=PRONInter+NA+ProxPl_Flags
@R.Prefix.NONE@ PRONInter+NA+ProxPl_Class=PRONInter+NA+ProxPl_Flags_Prefix=NONE ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: PRONInter+NA+ProxPl, Class: PRONInter+NA+ProxPl            !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending_Prefix=NONE                                        !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
